Louisiana, session 2026, HB364.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1381.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1381.1. Public awareness; discharge of firearm
A. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police,
shall conduct public awareness activities designed to promote the prevention of
discharging firearms into the air in public areas where discharging a firearm is
prohibited. The public awareness activities shall include but not be limited to public
service announcements via radio, television, and social media, promotion of relevant
telephone hotlines, and provision of information, regarding the danger of, and
criminal penalties for, discharging a firearm into the air in public areas where
prohibited.
B. The office of state police may collaborate with the Louisiana Department
of Health in order to implement the provisions of this Section in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 364 ENROLLED
C. The office of state police shall disseminate the public awareness
information to the public and to municipal police departments for further
dissemination to the public during the time periods specified in Subsection E of this
Section.
D. The production and dissemination of public awareness activities pursuant
to this Section shall be accomplished using funds allocated for such purpose to either
the Department of Public Safety and Corrections, the Louisiana Department of
Health, or municipal police departments.
E. The Department of Public Safety and Corrections, office of state police,
and municipal police departments shall disseminate the public awareness information
each year from May fifteenth through July fifth and from November fifteenth
through January first.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.